Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SHORT TITLE.new text end new text begin This act may be cited as the "Minnesota Public Safety Radio Communications Funding and Interoperability Act." new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 403.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Cost-share arrangement. new text end new text begin "Cost-share arrangement" means a funding mechanism whereby the state and participating local jurisdictions share the costs of public safety communications infrastructure according to a predetermined formula. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 403.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Interoperability. new text end new text begin "Interoperability" means the ability of public safety agencies to communicate with each other in real time using voice and data systems and exchange and use information on demand. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 403.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Network expansion. new text end new text begin "Network expansion" means the acquisition, construction, installation, upgrading, or enhancement of communications towers, equipment, infrastructure, or technology related to the ARMER network or other public safety radio communications systems. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 403.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7b. new text end new text begin Public safety agency. new text end new text begin "Public safety agency" means any federal, state, local, or Tribal agency providing law enforcement, fire, emergency medical, emergency management, or public works services. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [403.265] STATE FUNDING FOR ARMER NETWORK. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Elimination of county funding requirement. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no county is required to fund, through property taxes or other local revenue sources, the expansion, enhancement, or maintenance of the ARMER network. new text end new text begin (b) This subdivision does not prohibit voluntary participation by counties in cost-share arrangements as provided in subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Public safety radio communications infrastructure account. new text end new text begin (a) The public safety radio communications infrastructure account is created in the special revenue fund to support the ARMER network and related interoperable communications systems. The commissioners of public safety and transportation must administer the account in collaboration with the Statewide Emergency Communications Board. new text end new text begin (b) Money in the account consists of money as provided by law, dedicated revenue sources, and any other money donated, allotted, transferred, or otherwise provided to the account. new text end new text begin (c) Money in the account must only be used for: new text end new text begin (1) capital costs associated with ARMER network expansion and enhancement; new text end new text begin (2) maintenance and operational costs of the ARMER network; new text end new text begin (3) technology upgrades to ensure system reliability and interoperability; new text end new text begin (4) training and technical assistance related to public safety communications; and new text end new text begin (5) the Statewide Emergency Communications Board committees. new text end new text begin (d) Annually by ......, the commissioner of public safety must provide a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety detailing account revenues and expenditures and the status of ARMER network deployment and enhancement. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Optional cost-share program. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioners of public safety and transportation, in consultation with the Statewide Emergency Communications Board, may establish cost-share arrangements with local governments or Tribal governments for specific network expansion projects. new text end new text begin (b) Cost-share arrangements must: new text end new text begin (1) be voluntary and based on mutual agreement; new text end new text begin (2) provide clear financial benefits to participating local jurisdictions; new text end new text begin (3) not require local jurisdictions to contribute more than 25 percent of total project costs; and new text end new text begin (4) include provisions ensuring the state covers ongoing maintenance costs. new text end new text begin (c) The Statewide Emergency Communications Board must develop guidelines for cost-share arrangements, including application procedures, eligible projects, and cost-allocation formulas. new text end new text begin (d) Priority consideration in cost-share arrangements must be given to: new text end new text begin (1) projects enhancing interoperability across multiple jurisdictions; new text end new text begin (2) underserved areas lacking adequate public safety communications coverage; new text end new text begin (3) projects demonstrating regional collaboration; and new text end new text begin (4) jurisdictions with demonstrated financial hardship. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1 is effective the day following final enactment. Subdivisions 2 and 3 are effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin STATE FUNDING FOR ARMER NETWORK; IMPLEMENTATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Transition provisions. new text end new text begin (a) Within 270 days of the effective date of this section, the commissioner of public safety must: new text end new text begin (1) develop a transition plan for assuming financial responsibility for ongoing and planned projects; new text end new text begin (2) review all existing agreements requiring counties to fund ARMER network expansion; new text end new text begin (3) negotiate amendments or replacements to such agreements to conform with this section; and new text end new text begin (4) identify any statutory or regulatory changes needed to implement this section. new text end new text begin (b) Counties are not required to make any additional capital contributions for ARMER network expansion after the effective date of this section, provided that counties are responsible for payments due under existing bonded indebtedness until such obligations are satisfied or refinanced by the state. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may negotiate with counties to assume outstanding debt obligations related to ARMER network expansion, subject to available appropriations. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Rulemaking authority. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety may adopt rules to implement state funding for the ARMER network under Minnesota Statutes, section 403.265, including rules governing: new text end new text begin (1) administration of the public safety radio communications infrastructure account; new text end new text begin (2) cost-share arrangement procedures and formulas; new text end new text begin (3) grant application and award processes; new text end new text begin (4) reporting requirements for grant recipients; and new text end new text begin (5) other matters necessary to carry out the purposes of this act. new text end new text begin (b) Rules adopted under this subdivision are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 14. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Technical assistance. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must provide technical assistance to local jurisdictions on: new text end new text begin (1) transitioning to state-funded ARMER network infrastructure; new text end new text begin (2) achieving interoperability standards; new text end new text begin (3) accessing grant money and cost-share programs; new text end new text begin (4) implementing collaborative response protocols; and new text end new text begin (5) training personnel on interoperable communications systems. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Coordination with federal agencies. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must coordinate with federal agencies to: new text end new text begin (1) maximize federal funding opportunities for public safety communications; new text end new text begin (2) ensure state systems comply with federal interoperability standards; new text end new text begin (3) participate in national public safety communications initiatives; and new text end new text begin (4) share best practices with other states and jurisdictions. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin PUBLIC SAFETY RADIO COMMUNICATIONS DEDICATED REVENUE SOURCES; TAX RELIEF; REPORT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Dedicated revenue sources; report. new text end new text begin (a) The legislature must consider establishing dedicated revenue sources for the public safety radio communications infrastructure account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 403.265, which may include the following: new text end new text begin (1) surcharges on telecommunications services; new text end new text begin (2) fees; new text end new text begin (3) federal grants and matching money; new text end new text begin (4) revenue from state asset forfeitures designated for public safety purposes; or new text end new text begin (5) other revenue sources deemed appropriate. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety must study potential dedicated revenue sources for the public safety radio communications infrastructure account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 403.265, including but not limited to the potential dedicated revenue sources in paragraph (a), and submit a report of recommendations to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety by December 31, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin County tax relief. new text end new text begin The legislature recognizes that counties will realize significant property tax relief as a result of eliminating the requirement to fund ARMER network expansion under Minnesota Statutes, section 403.265, subdivision 1. Therefore, counties are encouraged to reinvest cost savings into local public safety priorities, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) law enforcement personnel and equipment; new text end new text begin (2) crime prevention and community policing programs; new text end new text begin (3) mental health crisis response services; new text end new text begin (4) emergency management capabilities; or new text end new text begin (5) other public safety needs identified by the county. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin PUBLIC SAFETY RADIO COMMUNICATIONS INFRASTRUCTURE ACCOUNT; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for deposit in the public safety radio communications infrastructure account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 403.265. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must renumber the subdivisions in Minnesota Statutes, section 403.21, so that the terms appear in alphabetical order and make necessary cross-reference changes consistent with the renumbering. new text end